Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.15.010

Authority to transact business required.

(1) Unless it is otherwise authorized to transact business pursuant to a state or federal statute, a foreign corporation may not transact business in this state until it registers with the secretary of state in accordance with Article 5 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

(2) A nonexhaustive list of activities that do not constitute transacting business in this state is provided in RCW 23.95.520.

[ 2015 c 176 s 2130; 1993 c 181 s 11; 1990 c 178 s 7; 1989 c 165 s 169.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.

Effective date—1990 c 178: See note following RCW 23B.01.220.